Maryland, session 2025, SB0540.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Corporations and Associations
5–6B–23.2.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COMMON AREA” MEANS ANY AREA IN A COOPERATIVE PROJECT
IN WHICH MEMBERS HAVE A POSSESSORY INTEREST IN COMMON.
(3) (I) “SENSITIVE INFORMATION” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL’S:
1. SOCIAL SECURITY CARD OR SOCIAL SECURITY
NUMBER;
2. INDIVIDUAL TAXPAYER IDENTIFICATION NUMBER;
3. BIRTH CERTIFICATE;
4. RACIAL OR ETHNIC ORIGIN;
5. NATIONAL ORIGIN;
6. CITIZENSHIP OR IMMIGRATION STATUS; OR
7. RELIGIOUS OR PHILOSOPHICAL BELIEFS; OR
8. MEDICAL RECORDS.
(II) “SENSITIVE INFORMATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN
INDIVIDUAL’S GOVERNMENT–ISSUED PHOTO IDENTIFICATION, SUCH AS A DRIVER’S
LICENSE.
(B) A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION MAY NOT REQUIRE A MEMBER
OR UNIT OCCUPANT, OR THE GUEST OR CHILD OF A MEMBER OR UNIT OCCUPANT,

SENATE BILL 540 3
TO PROVIDE SENSITIVE INFORMATION AS A CONDITION FOR ACCESSING OR USING A
RECREATIONAL COMMON AREA, SUCH AS A READING LOUNGE, GAME ROOM,
PLAYGROUND, OR SWIMMING POOL.
Article – Real Property
11–108.2.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “SENSITIVE INFORMATION” MEANS AN
INDIVIDUAL’S:
(I) SOCIAL SECURITY CARD OR SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER;
(II) INDIVIDUAL TAXPAYER IDENTIFICATION NUMBER;
(III) BIRTH CERTIFICATE;
(IV) RACIAL OR ETHNIC ORIGIN;
(V) NATIONAL ORIGIN;
(VI) CITIZENSHIP OR IMMIGRATION STATUS; OR
(VII) RELIGIOUS OR PHILOSOPHICAL BELIEFS; OR
(VIII) MEDICAL RECORDS.
(2) “SENSITIVE INFORMATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN INDIVIDUAL’S
GOVERNMENT–ISSUED PHOTO IDENTIFICATION, SUCH AS A DRIVER’S LICENSE.
(B) A CONDOMINIUM MAY NOT REQUIRE A UNIT OWNER OR OCCUPANT, OR
THE GUEST OR CHILD OF A UNIT OWNER OR OCCUPANT, TO PROVIDE SENSITIVE
INFORMATION AS A CONDITION FOR ACCESSING OR USING A RECREATIONAL
COMMON AREA, SUCH AS A READING LOUNGE, GAME ROOM, PLAYGROUND, OR
SWIMMING POOL.
11B–111.11.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “SENSITIVE INFORMATION” MEANS AN
INDIVIDUAL’S:
(I) SOCIAL SECURITY CARD OR SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER;
(II) INDIVIDUAL TAXPAYER IDENTIFICATION NUMBER;

SENATE BILL 540
(III) BIRTH CERTIFICATE;
(IV) RACIAL OR ETHNIC ORIGIN;
(V) NATIONAL ORIGIN;
(VI) CITIZENSHIP OR IMMIGRATION STATUS; OR
(VII) RELIGIOUS OR PHILOSOPHICAL BELIEFS; OR
(VIII) MEDICAL RECORDS.
(2) “SENSITIVE INFORMATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN INDIVIDUAL’S
GOVERNMENT–ISSUED PHOTO IDENTIFICATION, SUCH AS A DRIVER’S LICENSE.
(B) A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION MAY NOT REQUIRE A LOT OWNER OR
OCCUPANT, OR THE GUEST OR CHILD OF A LOT OWNER OR OCCUPANT, TO PROVIDE
SENSITIVE INFORMATION AS A CONDITION FOR ACCESSING OR USING A
RECREATIONAL COMMON AREA, SUCH AS A READING LOUNGE, GAME ROOM,
PLAYGROUND, OR SWIMMING POOL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.